District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.08

Confidential information and trade secrets.

Information submitted to the Mayor pursuant to this chapter may be designated by the Mayor as confidential upon a showing of good cause by the person submitting the information. Except as otherwise provided by law or court order, information the Mayor deems confidential may be used only by the Mayor, the Mayor’s agents and employees, other District agencies, and, as authorized by the Mayor, the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 122, 61 DCR 9971